District of Columbia statutes.
2-1535.08

Availability of other remedies.

This subchapter does not create a new private right of action or provide a statutory basis for a claim for damages against the District of Columbia or its employees.

History

Sept. 14, 2012, D.C. Law 19-167, § 9, 59 DCR 7820